Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-927
Law enforcement agencies; education and training programs.

All law enforcement agencies in the state shall provide officers employed by them with an education and training program designed to inform the officers of the problems of domestic abuse, procedures to deal with such problems, no-contact periods under sections 26-201 to 26-207, the Protection from Domestic Abuse Act, the Protection Orders Act, and the services and facilities available to abused family and household members.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 27;

Laws 1997, LB 829, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB80, § 42;

Laws 2026, LB935, § 39.
January 1, 2027
Protection Orders Act, see section 26-101.